Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-215
Theatres, churches, halls; licenses; safety regulations.

A city of the primary class shall have the power to regulate, license, or suppress halls, opera houses, churches, places of amusement, entertainment, or instruction, or other buildings used for the assembly of citizens. A city of the primary class may cause such buildings to be provided with sufficient and ample means of exit and entrance and to be supplied with necessary and appropriate appliances for the extinguishment of fires and for escape from such places in case of fire. A city of the primary class may prevent overcrowding and regulate the placing of seats, chairs, benches, scenery, curtains, blinds, screens, or other appliances in such buildings. A city of the primary class may provide that for any violation of any such regulation a penalty of not to exceed two hundred dollars shall be imposed, and that upon the conviction of any violation of any ordinance regulating such places, the license of such place shall be revoked by the mayor and city council. Whenever the mayor or city council shall by resolution declare any such place to be unsafe, the license thereof shall be thereby revoked, and the city council may provide that in any case where they have so revoked the license, any owner, proprietor, manager, lessee, or person opening, using, or permitting such place to be opened or used, involving the assembling of more than twelve persons, shall upon conviction thereof be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and fined in any sum not exceeding two hundred dollars.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XIX, p. 132;

R.S.1913, § 4429;

C.S.1922, § 3813;

C.S.1929, § 15-216;

R.S.1943, § 15-215;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 32.